Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,160
Governmental vehicle; exempt from fee.

No registration fee shall be charged for any motor vehicle or trailer owned or leased and used by any city or village of this state, any rural fire protection district, the Civil Air Patrol, any public school district, any county, the state, the United States Government, any entity formed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, or the Joint Public Agency Act, or any municipal public body or authority used in operating a public passenger transportation system.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 160.

Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, see section 13-2001.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.